District of Columbia statutes.
29-807.04

Other claims against dissolved limited liability company.

(a)

A dissolved limited liability company may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the company to present them in accordance with the notice.

(b)

The notice authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall:

(1)

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the District;

(2)

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent; and

(3)

State that a claim against the company is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced within 3 years after publication of the notice.

(c)

If a dissolved limited liability company publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the company within 3 years after the publication date of the notice, the claim of each of the following claimants shall be barred:

(1)

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under § 29-807.03;

(2)

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the company but not acted on; and

(3)

A claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the effective date of dissolution.

(d)

A claim not barred under this section or § 29-807.03 may be enforced:

(1)

Against a dissolved limited liability company, to the extent of its undistributed assets; and

(2)

If assets of the company have been distributed after dissolution, against a member or transferee to the extent of that person’s proportionate share of the claim or of the assets distributed to the member or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person’s total liability for all claims under this paragraph shall not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(8)(C), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-804.05 and § 29-807.07.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “this section or § 29-807.03” for “this section” in (d).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 704 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.